Vermont, session 2025-2026, S233.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SPECIAL EDUCATION FAMILY ADVOCACY PILOT PROGRAM
(a) In fiscal year 2027, $250,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Agency of Human Services to establish a two-year pilot program that
awards grants to develop special education family advocacy pilot programs.
The pilot programs shall aim to:
(1) ensure that families of kindergarten through grade 12 students have
access to knowledgeable, neutral advocates to guide them through the
VT LEG #385799 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.233
2026 Page 2 of 3
individualized education program (IEP) process, including access to in-person
support during IEP meetings;
(2) strengthen collaboration between schools and parents; and
(3) help prevent costly disputes and due process hearings by addressing
issues early.
(b) The Agency shall seek applications from school districts, parent child
centers, and other interested nonprofit organizations. Successful applicants
shall submit an application to the Agency describing how the applicant, if
awarded a grant, shall:
(1) train advocates to provide direct support for parents of children with
disabilities in grades kindergarten through 12 through the IEP process;
(2) provide trainings for parents to prepare and empower them to
advocate on their own during the IEP process; and
(3) collaborate with school districts with the goal of supporting all
involved parties to work together in the best interests of students.
(c) On or before November 15, 2027, the Agency shall submit a written
report to the House Committees on Education and on Human Services and to
the Senate Committees on Education and on Health and Welfare evaluating the
pilot program created pursuant to this section and any recommended future
actions. In drafting the report required pursuant to this subsection, the Agency
shall seek the input of the Agency of Education in evaluating the need for and
VT LEG #385799 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.233
2026 Page 3 of 3
effectiveness of the pilot program and include the Agency of Education’s
response as part of the report.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385799 v.2